Nevada, session 83, SB358.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 237 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, each
governmental agency shall accept from a business entity as
payment for any fee, tax or other debt to the governmental agency
payment by debit card, credit card, check or electronic transfer of
money.
2. In addition to the methods of payment which a
governmental agency is required by subsection 1 to accept from a
business entity as payment for any fee, tax or other debt to the
governmental agency, a governmental agency may, at its
discretion, accept payment by other methods, including, without
limitation, cash or money order.
3. The provisions of subsection 1 do not apply to payments
made:
(a) Pursuant to NRS 353.1467;
(b) To the Department of Taxation pursuant to paragraph (b)
of subsection 1 of NRS 360A.040;
(c) To the Cannabis Compliance Board;
(d) To the Division of Insurance of the Department of
Business and Industry; or
(e) To any court of the Judicial Department of State
Government.
4. As used in this section:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
(a) “Electronic transfer of money” has the meaning ascribed
to it in NRS 353.1467.
(b) “Governmental agency” means an officer, agency, branch,
board, commission, department, division, bureau, district, city,
county or any other political subdivision or unit of government of
this State.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)